Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1724
Financial records.

The person or entity responsible for making or collecting common expense assessments or maintenance assessments shall keep detailed financial records. All financial and other records shall be made reasonably available for examination by any time-share interval owner and his or her authorized agents.

Laws 1980, LB 945, § 24.